Utah statutes.
32A-11a-105 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Prohibited conduct of supplier.
(1)  A supplier may not:
(a)  induce, coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any wholesaler to engage
in any illegal act or course of conduct;
(b)  impose a requirement that is discriminatory by its terms or in the
methods of enforcement as compared to requirements imposed by the supplier on
similarly situated wholesalers;
(c)  prohibit a wholesaler from selling the product of any other supplier;
(d)  fix or maintain the price at which a wholesaler may resell beer;
(e)  fail to execute with each wholesaler of its brands a written
distributorship agreement;
(f)  require any wholesaler to accept delivery of any beer or any other item
that is not voluntarily ordered by the wholesaler;
(g)  restrict or inhibit, directly or indirectly, the right of a wholesaler to
participate in an organization representing interests of wholesalers for any
lawful purpose;
(h)  require a wholesaler to participate in or contribute to any local,
regional, or national advertising fund or other promotional activity that:
(i)  is not used for advertising or promotional activities in the wholesaler's
sales territory; or
(ii)  would require contributions by the wholesaler in excess of the amounts
specified in the distributorship agreement;
(i)  retaliate against a wholesaler that files a complaint with the department
or the applicable federal agency regarding an alleged violation by the
supplier of a state or federal law or administrative rule;
(j)  require without good cause any change in the manager of a wholesaler who
has previously been approved by the supplier;
(k)  if a wholesaler changes its approved manager, prohibit the change unless
the new manager fails to meet the reasonable standards for similarly situated
wholesalers of the supplier as stated in the distributorship agreement; or
(l)  refuse to deliver beer products covered by a distributorship agreement to
the wholesaler:
(i)  in reasonable quantities; and
(ii)  within a reasonable time after receipt of the wholesaler's order.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(l), the supplier may refuse to deliver
products if the refusal is due to:
(a)  the wholesaler's failure to pay the supplier pursuant to the
distributorship agreement;
(b)  an unforeseeable event beyond the supplier's control;
(c)  a work stoppage or delay due to a strike or labor problem;
(d)  a bona fide shortage of materials; or
(e)  a freight embargo.
